test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_keessid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - keessiđ: #generated from FST; MLO checked
    keessiđ+V+Inf: keessiđ
    keessiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiäsám
    keessiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiäsá #ok
    keessiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: keesih #keesih
    keessiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: keessim
    keessiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: keesij #corpus
    keessiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: keesi # ok
    keessiđ+V+PrfPrc: kiässám #mij keesijm


  Verb - peehiđ: # MLO, checked iä
    peehiđ+V+Inf: peehiđ
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piävám
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: piäváh
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piähá
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: pehheen
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: pehivettee
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: peehiv
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: peehip
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pehivetteđ
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: peehih
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: peehim
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: peehih
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: peevij
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: pevvijm
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: pevvijd
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: pevvijn
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: peevijm
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: peevijd
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: pehhii
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: piäváččim
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: piäváččih
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: piäváččij
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: piäváččáim
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: piäváččáid
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: piäváččáin
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: piäváččijm
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: piäváččijd
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: piäváččii
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: peeveem #checked with Petter + the Matti-namesakes WG + 4 e's
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: peeveeh
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: peeviš
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: pevižeen
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: peevišvettee
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: pevižává
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: pevižep
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: peevišvetteđ
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: pevižeh
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: peevi
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: piävus
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: piähhoon
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: pehhee
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: piähus
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: piähhup
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: peehiđ
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: piähus
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: peevi
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: piähám
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: piäváččii
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: piävváá
    peehiđ+V+PrsPrc: pehhee
    peehiđ+V+PrfPrc: piähám
    peehiđ+V+Actio+Nom: peehim
    peehiđ+V+Actio+Ess: pehimin
    peehiđ+V+Actio+Loc: pehimist
    peehiđ+V+Actio+Ill: pehimân
    peehiđ+V+Actio+Com: pevidijn
    peehiđ+V+VAbess: pevihánnáá

  Verb - seevviđ: #generated from FST; MLO checked
    seevviđ+V+Inf: seevviđ
    seevviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: siävám #ok
    seevviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siävá #ok
    seevviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: seevih
    seevviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: seevvim
    seevviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: seevij
    seevviđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: seevi #ok
    seevviđ+V+PrfPrc: siävvám
